Utah statutes.
63G-14-302.   Penalties on sponsors.

In accordance with Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the department may:

(1)  impose a fine on a sponsor who violates Subsection 63G-14-203(5) not to exceed $5,000; and

(2)  prohibit a sponsor from sponsoring another resident alien for a period of five years for a violation described in Subsection 63G-14-203(3)(b).

